src/fst/morphology/affixes/postverbal_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@ @D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ @D.STEM.MODIFIED@ @D.STEM@ @D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @P.DF.ON@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@ @R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ @R.STEM.MODIFIED@ @R.STEM.PLAIN@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.ENCLITIC.gu@ @U.ENCLITIC.gula@ @U.ENCLITIC.la@ @U.NOMINALIZATION.A@ @U.NOMINALIZATION.I@ @U.NOMINALIZATION.NA@ @U.NOMINALIZATION.RELZ@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@ @U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ ^Encl

! TODO: Implement other enclitics (e.g., -dà, -di, -ìdaa, etc.) and their
! corresponding selectional restrictions in separate continuation lexica below.

! TODO: Handle sequences of suffixes and enclitics (e.g., nominalization with
! -í followed by -tii, delayed future -i followed by =ìgùł, etc.)


LEXICON Root

! Suffixation requires the use of a modified verb stem form whenever one has
! been specified in the lexical database (e.g., átłík'adìsaàdál "we came
! together, we met" [plain, non-nominalized stem -dál] -> átłík'adìsaàdátł'í
! "our meeting, the fact that we met" [nominalized stem -dátł', together with
! relativizer -í]).
@R.STEM.MODIFIED@                           Suffixation;
@D.STEM@                                    Suffixation;

! By contrast, encliticization requires the use of the plain stem form
! whenever one is given in the lexical database.
!
! Encliticization is phonologically straightforward in Tsuut'ina: almost all
! verb forms do not change when an enclitic is added to them (e.g., nàmò
! "he/she/it goes to war" -> nàmò-ná "the ones that go to war"). The only
! exception is with forms ending in a mid-tone vowel: in these cases, the
! enclitic causes the final vowel to gain high tone (e.g., ìsni "he/she/it
! says" -> ìsní-la "he/she/it says (it was)", nistsìtł'a "I am small" ->
! nistsìtł'á-gù "when I was small").
!
! We handle the latter pattern by adding the symbol "^Encl" after the stem
! (before we land in this lexicon), which can be rewritten in the phonology
! to change a preceding mid-tone, stem-final vowel to high.
@R.STEM.PLAIN@0:@R.STEM.PLAIN@^Encl         Encliticization;
@D.STEM@0:@D.STEM@^Encl                     Encliticization;

! There can always be a non-suffixed and non-encliticized form, too.
@D.STEM.MODIFIED@                           #;


LEXICON Suffixation
                                            Suffixes;
                                            SuffixesOnly3Sg;

LEXICON Encliticization
                                            Enclitics;
                                            naNominalization;


LEXICON Suffixes
! Relativization with -í "(the fact) that" applies to verb forms in any
! aspect/superaspect inflected for any referent.  We follow Bruce Starlight
! in distinguishing this affix from the homophonous nominalizer -í "the
! one who", which appears only with 3SG referents.
@U.NOMINALIZATION.RELZ@0:@U.NOMINALIZATION.RELZ@í  #;

! All Tsuut'ina verbs, both stative and dynamic, can appear with the delayed
! future suffix -i.  In imperfective, imperfective repetitive, and
! progressive verb forms, this suffix is generally interpreted as "later on"
! (cf. TLL-20220203):
!
!   itsiy   "3S will cry" (IPFV)
!       -> itsiyi "3S will cry later on" (IPFV-DF)
!   yitsáł  "3S is going along crying" (PROG)
!       -> yitsáłi "3S will be going along crying later on" (PROG-DF)
!   náchish "3S cries again and again" (IPFV-REP)
!       -> náchishi "3S cries again and again later on" (IPFV-REP-DF)
!
! In perfective and perfective repetitive verb forms, this suffix indicates
! that the action would have taken place later on but didn't (cf. TLL-20220203,
! TLL-20220208):
!
!   átsàd   "3S ate (something)" (PFV)
!       -> átsàdi   "3S would have eaten (something) later on" (PFV-DF)
!   nááyínòsh "3S would ate (something) again and again" (PFV-REP)
!       -> nááyínòshi   "3S would have eaten (something) again and again
!                        later on"
!
! Other enclitics can follow the delayed future (e.g., =ìsà "probably", =gulà
! "might, may"), which trigger the mid-to-high tone changes mentioned above
! (cf. TLL-20220208):
!
!   átsàdi  "3S would have eaten (something) later on" (PFV-DF)
!       -> átsàdí-ìsà  "3S probably would have eaten (something) later on"
!
! (For now, we don't produce/recognize these encliticized delayed future
! forms, since we will need to make sure that all of these enclitics form
! acceptable combinations with the delayed future)
@P.DF.ON@0:@P.DF.ON@i                       # "(delayed future)" ;


LEXICON SuffixesOnly3Sg
! Certain affixes appear only with verb forms that contain at least one third-
! person singular referent, whether that is the subject, direct object, or
! indirect object.
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@                      SuffixOnly3SgSbj;
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@                  SuffixOnly3SgDObj;
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@                  SuffixOnly3SgIObj;
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@                    SuffixOnly3SgSbj;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                      SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObj;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@                    SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObj;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                   SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrIObj;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                    SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObjOrIObj;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgSbj
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgForms;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgDObj
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgForms;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgIObj
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgForms;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObj
! 3SG subject, 3SG direct object
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;

! 3SG subject, non-3SG direct object
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgSbj;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgSbj;
@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgSbj;

! Non-3SG subject, 3SG direct object
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrIObj
! 3SG subject, 3SG indirect object
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgIObj;

! 3SG subject, non-3SG indirect object
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgSbj;
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@R.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgSbj;
@R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgSbj;

! Non-3SG subject, 3SG indirect object
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgIObj;
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgIObj;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgIObj;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgDObjOrIObj
! 3SG direct object, 3SG indirect object
@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgIObj;

! 3SG direct object, non-3SG indirect object
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@R.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;
@R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObj;

! Non-3SG direct object, 3SG indirect object
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgIObj;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgIObj;
@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgIObj;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObjOrIObj
! 3SG subject, 3SG direct object, and 3SG indirect object.
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@R.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@    SuffixOnly3SgForms;

! Non-3SG direct object - see if the subject and/or the indirect object is 3SG.
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrIObj;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrIObj;
@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@        SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrIObj;

! Non-3SG indirect object - see if the subject and/or the direct object is 3SG.
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObj;
@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@R.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObj;
@R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgSbjOrDObj;

! Non-3SG subject - see if the direct and/or indirect object is 3SG.
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObjOrIObj;
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObjOrIObj;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      SuffixOnly3SgDObjOrIObj;

LEXICON SuffixOnly3SgForms
! Nominalization with -í "the one who" applies to verb forms that contain
! at least one third-person singular referent.  (Note that we distinguish
! this affix from the homophonous relativizer -í "(the fact) that", which
! Bruce insists is a different affix and appears with any person-number
! combination)
@U.NOMINALIZATION.I@0:@U.NOMINALIZATION.I@í  #;

! Nominalization with -à "the one that" (generally used in personal names)
! applies to verb forms that contain at least one third-person singular
! referent.
@U.NOMINALIZATION.A@0:@U.NOMINALIZATION.A@à  #;


LEXICON Enclitics

! Verbal enclitics that attach without major selectional restrictions.
@U.ENCLITIC.gu@:-gù                         # "while; so that, in order that" ;
@U.ENCLITIC.la@:-la                         # "it is, it was (narrative)" ;
@U.ENCLITIC.gula@:-gulà                     # "might, may" ;


LEXICON naNominalization
! Nominalization with =ná "the ones that" applies only to verb forms that
! contain at least one third-person referent.  (We have to consider valence
! here, since our dummy 3SG subjects in experiencer verbs shouldn't trigger
! this affix.  All the more reason to move away from 3SG subjects in these
! forms to actual impersonals...)

!@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@      naNominalizationExperiencer;
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@      naNominalizationExperiencer;

@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@        naNominalizationNonExperiencer;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@          naNominalizationNonExperiencer;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@        naNominalizationNonExperiencer;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@       naNominalizationNonExperiencer;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@        naNominalizationNonExperiencer;

LEXICON naNominalizationNonExperiencer
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@             naNominalizationAffix;
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@             naNominalizationExperiencer;

LEXICON naNominalizationExperiencer
@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@   naNominalizationAffix;
@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@   naNominalizationAffix;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@@R.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@   naNominalizationAffix;

LEXICON naNominalizationAffix
@U.NOMINALIZATION.NA@0:@U.NOMINALIZATION.NA@-ná          #;
